Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Mississippi Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Law
§ 53-9-33.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; requisites for approval of application for permit; schedule of notices of violation; permit to mine on prime farmland; restriction on transfer of rights; modification of permit provisions.

Upon the basis of a complete application for permit or a complete application for modification or reissuance of a permit, including public notification and an opportunity for public hearing as required by Section 53-9-37, the permit board shall issue, deny or modify the permit within the time required under Section 53-9-37 and shall notify the applicant in writing of its action within the time required under Section 53-9-39. The applicant for a permit or modification of a permit shall have the burden of establishing that its complete application is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter. The action of the permit board shall be effective upon the initial decision by the permit board as recorded in the minutes of the permit board.

No permit or modification shall be issued or granted unless the application affirmatively demonstrates, and the permit board finds in writing on the basis of the information set forth in the application or from information otherwise available which shall be documented in the written findings of the permit board and made available to the applicant, that:

The permit application is accurate and complete, and the applicant and application have complied with all requirements of this chapter and the regulations promulgated under this chapter;

The applicant has demonstrated that reclamation as required by this chapter and the regulations promulgated under this chapter can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the permit application;

The assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated mining in the area on the hydrologic balance as specified in Section 53-9-25, has been made by the state geologist and the proposed operation has been designed to prevent material damage to hydrologic balance outside the permit area;

The area proposed to be mined is not included within an area designated unsuitable for surface coal mining under Section 53-9-71, or is not within an area that is the subject of an administrative proceeding for that designation commenced under Section 53-9-71; and

If the private coal estate has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant shall have submitted to the permit board:

The written consent of the surface owners to the extraction of coal by surface mining methods; or

A conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract the coal by surface mining methods.

Any determination made by the permit board under paragraph (e) of this subsection shall not be construed as an adjudication of property rights.

If the area proposed to be mined contains prime farmland the permit board shall issue a permit to mine on prime farmland if the permit board finds in writing that the operator has satisfied the requirements of subsection (2) of this section and has the technological capability to restore the mined area within a reasonable time to equivalent or higher levels of yield as nonmined prime farmland in the surrounding area under equivalent levels of management and can meet the soil reconstruction standards in the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45.

No transfer, assignment or sale of the rights granted under any permit issued under this chapter shall be made without approval of the permit board.

The permit board shall, within a period of time established in regulations promulgated by the commission, review outstanding permits and may require reasonable modification of the permit provisions during the term of that permit. Any modification shall be based upon a written finding and subject to notice and hearing requirements established by this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, §§ 15(2)-15(4); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-35.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; revisions.

During the term of the permit, the permittee may submit an application for a revision of the permit and a revised reclamation plan, to the department in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission.

An application for a revision of a permit shall not be approved unless the executive director finds that reclamation as required by this chapter and the regulations promulgated under this chapter can be accomplished under the revised reclamation plan. The revision shall be granted or denied by the executive director within a period of time established in the regulations promulgated by the commission. The commission shall also promulgate regulations for determination of the extent to which a revision application shall comply with this chapter, including notice and hearing requirements. A decision by the executive director to grant or deny a revision of a permit shall be subject to formal hearing and appeal as would an initial decision of the permit board under Section 49-17-29.

Any extensions to the area covered by the permit except incidental boundary revisions must be made by application for a new permit. A revision shall not be considered a modification.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 16; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-37.
Advertisement of land ownership; public comment on intention to mine or objections to application for permit; informal conferences; authority of permit board to conduct hearings on own motion.

Upon submission of a complete application for a permit or modification of an existing permit, under this chapter and the regulations promulgated under this chapter, the applicant shall submit to the permit board a copy of the applicant’s advertisement of the ownership, precise location and boundaries of the land to be affected. At the time of submission, the applicant shall place the advertisement for publication at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a local newspaper and in a regional newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed surface coal mine is to be located. If no local newspaper of general circulation in the county is published, notice shall be published once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a regional newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed surface coal mine is to be located and in a newspaper of general statewide circulation published in Jackson. The permit board shall notify local governmental bodies, planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, or water companies in the county in which the proposed surface coal mining will take place of the submission of the complete permit application. The permit board shall notify them of the operator’s intention to surface mine coal on a particularly described tract of land, the number of the permit application and where a copy and summary of the proposed surface coal mining and reclamation plan may be inspected. These local bodies, agencies, authorities or companies may submit written comments within a reasonable period established by the commission on the effect of the proposed operation on the environment which is within their area of responsibility. The comments shall be transmitted as soon as possible to the applicant by the permit board and shall be made available to the public at the same locations as the surface coal mining and reclamation permit application. The failure of any person to submit comments within the time established by the commission shall not preclude action by the commission.

Any interested party or the officer or head of any federal, state or local governmental agency or authority, may file written objections to the complete application for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit, or modification of an existing permit, with the permit board within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section. Any objections shall be transmitted as soon as possible to the applicant by the permit board and shall be made available to the public.

Within forty-five (45) days after the last publication of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section, any interested party may request that the permit board conduct a public hearing concerning the complete application. If a public hearing is requested, the permit board shall hold a public hearing in the county of the proposed surface coal mining and reclamation operations within ninety (90) days after receipt of the first request for a public hearing. Before issuance of a permit, the permit board shall hold a public hearing at a suitable location in the county of the proposed surface coal mining and reclamation operation. The date, time and location of any public hearing shall be advertised by the permit board in the same manner as provided for the publication of notice for advertisement of land ownership under subsection (1) of this section. The last public hearing notice shall be published at least thirty (30) days before the scheduled public hearing date. An electronic or stenographic record shall be made of the public hearing proceeding. Any person requesting transcription of the record shall bear the costs of that transcription. That record shall be maintained and shall be accessible to the public until final release of the applicant’s performance bond or other collateral. If all persons requesting the public hearing stipulate agreement before the requested public hearing and withdraw their request, the public hearing may be cancelled at the discretion of the permit board.

The permit board shall arrange with the applicant, upon request by any interested party requesting a public hearing, reasonable access to the area of the proposed surface coal mining and reclamation operation for the purpose of gathering information relevant to the proceeding before the public hearing. If that request is made less than one (1) week before the scheduled date of the public hearing, access may not be provided before the public hearing.

The permit board shall act upon a complete permit application within sixty (60) days after the date of the public hearing. If no public hearing is requested or required, the permit board shall act within sixty (60) days after the last publication of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section. The time frames may be extended if agreed in writing by the department and the applicant.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the permit board on its own motion from conducting public hearings to obtain information from the public regarding the proposed surface coal mining operations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 18; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-39.
Disposition of application for permit; manner of notifying interested parties; hearing before review board and notification of decision; temporary relief; right to judicial appeal.

Within fourteen (14) days after issuing or denying a permit or granting or denying a modification to an existing permit, as recorded in the minutes of the permit board, the permit board shall notify by mail to the last-known address, the following:

The permit applicant;

The mayor of each municipality and the president of the board of supervisors of each county in which the permit area is located;

Persons who submitted written comments concerning the application in the time, manner and form as provided by regulation, if those persons provided the permit board with a complete address; and

Persons who requested the public hearing, if a public hearing was held, if those persons provided the permit board with a complete address.

The notification required under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall include a description of the permit area and a summary of the mining and reclamation plan.

If the permit board denies the permit, the permit board shall provide the applicant in writing specific reasons for its denial.

Within forty-five (45) days after the action of the permit board, as recorded in the minutes of the permit board, the applicant or any other interested party may request a formal hearing. If the permit board fails to take action within the time allowed under Section 53-9-37, any interested party may request a formal hearing on that failure to act. Any formal hearing shall be conducted within sixty (60) days after receipt of the first request for a formal hearing. No person who presided at a public hearing on an application for the same surface coal mining and reclamation operation under Section 53-9-37 shall preside at the formal hearing. At the conclusion of the formal hearing or within thirty (30) days after the formal hearing, the permit board shall enter in its minutes a final decision affirming, modifying or reversing its prior decision to issue or deny the permit. The permit board shall mail within seven (7) days after its final decision as recorded in the minutes of the permit board, notice of that decision to the applicant and all persons who participated as a party in the formal hearing. The deadlines in this subsection may be extended by written agreement of the parties.

If a hearing is requested under subsection (3) of this section, the permit board may, under any conditions as it may prescribe, grant temporary relief as it deems appropriate pending a final action if:

All proper parties to the formal hearing have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting that relief shows that there is substantial likelihood that the person will prevail on the merits of the final action; and

Any relief shall not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air or water resources.

A verbatim record of each formal hearing held under this chapter shall be made.

Any applicant or any person who participated as a party in the formal hearing and who is aggrieved by the final action of the permit board may appeal that action in accordance with Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, §§ 15(1) and 19; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-41.
Coal exploration permit; application; limitation on removal; penalty for disturbing land surface.

Coal exploration operations which substantially disturb the natural land surface shall be conducted in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the commission governing those operations. The regulations shall require any person planning to conduct exploration operations to obtain an exploration permit from the permit board before conducting those operations. The permit application shall require the applicant to give a description of the exploration area and the period of proposed exploration, provisions for reclamation in accordance with the performance standards in the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45 of all lands disturbed in exploration, including excavations, roads, drill holes and the removal of necessary facilities and equipment, and any other information as the permit board or commission may require.

Any person who conducts any coal exploration activities which substantially disturb the natural land surface in violation of this section or regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be subject to Sections 53-9-55 through 53-9-57 and Section 53-9-63.

No operator shall remove more than two hundred fifty (250) tons of coal under an exploration permit without the specific written approval of the permit board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 17; Laws, 1990, ch. 442, § 14; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-43.
Confidentiality claims; penalties.

Information submitted to the department, commission or permit board concerning trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information relating to the competitive rights of an applicant and which is specifically identified as confidential, shall not be available for public examination and shall not be considered as a public record if:

The applicant submits a written confidentiality claim to the commission before the submission of the information; and

The commission determines the confidentiality claim to be valid.

The confidentiality claim shall include a generic description of the nature of the information included in the submission. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the Mississippi Public Records Act regarding access to confidential information. Any information for which a confidentiality claim is asserted shall not be disclosed pending the outcome of any formal hearing and all appeals.

Any person knowingly and willfully making unauthorized disclosures of any information determined to be confidential shall be liable for civil damages arising from the unauthorized disclosure and, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and dismissed from public office or employment. This section is supplemental to remedies for misappropriation of a trade secret provided in the Mississippi Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 20(1); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-45.
Promulgation of regulations and performance standards relating to surface mining; variances.

Any permit issued under this chapter to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations or coal exploration operations shall require that those surface coal mining and reclamation operations or coal exploration operations meet all applicable performance standards of this chapter and any other requirements the commission shall promulgate.

The commission shall promulgate regulations establishing general environmental protection performance standards which shall be applicable to all surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the state. Those regulations shall:

Assure that the surface coal mining operations are conducted so as to maximize the utilization and conservation of the coal being recovered so that reaffecting the land in the future through surface coal mining can be minimized;

Assure that the uses the affected land is capable of supporting after restoration are equivalent to or higher and better than the uses that existed before mining;

Assure restoration of the approximate original contour of the land with all highwalls, spoil piles and depressions eliminated, unless an exception is provided under this section;

Assure surface area stabilization;

Assure preservation and restoration of topsoil or other strata which is better able to support vegetation;

Provide for removal, storage, replacement and reconstruction of soils on prime farmlands;

Assure water drainage and silt control for all the affected areas to strictly control soil erosion, damage to adjacent lands and pollution of streams and other waters, both during and following the mining operations. Before, during and for a reasonable period after mining, all drainways for the affected area shall be protected with silt traps, dams, or other structures or devices of approved design as directed by the regulations. The operator may elect to impound water to provide lakes or ponds of approved design for wildlife, recreational or water supply purposes, if it is a part of the approved mining and reclamation plan, and if those impoundments are constructed in accordance with applicable federal and state laws and regulations;

Govern the proper conduct of augering operations or prohibit those operations under certain circumstances;

Provide for the minimization of disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance and to the quality and quantity of water in ground water and surface water systems using the best technology currently available;

Govern the management and surface disposal of mine wastes;

Govern the circumstances under which surface coal mining and reclamation operations may be conducted near active or abandoned underground mines;

Govern the use of mine waste piles as dams or embankments;

Govern the management and disposal of debris and hazardous or toxic materials;

Govern the use of explosives;

Assure contemporaneous reclamation in an environmentally sound manner;

Govern access roads;

Govern revegetation;

Govern the duration of responsibility for revegetation with a minimum period of responsibility of not less than five (5) years;

Assure protection of offsite areas;

Govern the management and disposal of excess spoil material;

Assure the minimization of disturbances and adverse impacts on fish, wildlife and related environmental values using the best technology currently available;

Provide for barriers to slides and erosion; and

Provide for any other criteria deemed necessary by the commission to achieve reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this chapter and the federal act.

The following performance standards shall be applicable to steep-slope surface coal mining and shall be in addition to those general performance standards required by the regulations promulgated under this section. This subsection shall not apply to surface coal mining and reclamation operations on flat or gently rolling terrain or on which an occasional steep slope is encountered through which the mining operation is to proceed, leaving a plain or predominantly flat area. The performance standards promulgated under this subsection shall:

Insure that when performing surface coal mining on steep slopes, no debris, abandoned or disabled equipment, spoil material or waste mineral matter is placed on the downslope below the bench or mining cut, unless that spoil material in excess of that required for the reconstruction of the approximate original contour under the regulations promulgated under subsection (2) of this section or under paragraph (b) of this subsection is permanently stored in accordance with the regulations promulgated under subsection (2) of this section;

Require complete backfilling with spoil material to cover completely the highwall and return the site to the approximate original contour. The material shall maintain stability following mining and reclamation;

Provide that the operator may not disturb land above the top of the highwall unless the permit board finds that the disturbance will facilitate compliance with the general environmental protection standards promulgated under this section, but the land disturbed above the highwall shall be limited to that amount necessary to facilitate compliance.

For the purposes of this subsection, the term “steep slope” means any slope above twenty (20) degrees or any lesser slope defined by the commission after consideration of soil, climate and other characteristics of the region of the state.

The commission may grant variances for the purposes set forth in paragraphs (b)(i), (ii) and (iii) of this subsection, if the watershed control of the area is improved, and complete backfilling with spoil material is required to cover completely the highwall, which material will maintain stability following mining and reclamation.

If an applicant meets the requirements of subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph and paragraph (c) of this subsection, a variance from the requirement to restore to approximate original contour set forth in subsection (3) of this section may be granted for the surface mining of coal if the owner of the surface rights knowingly requests in writing, as a part of the permit application, that the variance be granted to render the land, after reclamation, suitable for an industrial, commercial, residential or public use, including recreational facilities, in accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection and if:

After notification of appropriate federal, state and local governmental agencies providing an opportunity to comment on the proposed use and consultation with appropriate land use planning agencies, if any, the proposed postmining use of the affected land is deemed by the permit board to constitute an equal or better economic or public use of the land as compared with the premining use;

The proposed postmining land use is compatible with adjacent land uses and state and local land use planning, economically practical for the proposed use and designed and certified by a qualified registered professional engineer in conformance with professional standards established to assure the stability, drainage and configuration necessary for the intended use of the site; and

After approval of the appropriate state environmental agencies, the watershed of the affected land is deemed to be improved.

In granting a variance under this subsection, the commission shall require that only the necessary amount of spoil will be placed off the mine bench to achieve the planned postmining land use, insure stability of the spoil retained on the bench, and meet all other requirements of this chapter. All spoil placement off the mine bench must comply with the regulations promulgated under subsection (2) of this section.

The commission shall promulgate specific regulations to govern the granting of variances in accord with this subsection, and may impose any additional requirements it deems necessary.

All variances granted under this subsection shall be reviewed not more than three (3) years from the date of issuance of the permit, unless the permittee affirmatively demonstrates that the proposed development is proceeding in accordance with the terms of the approved schedule and the mining and reclamation plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 20(2)-(4); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 22; Laws, 1998, ch. 373, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 53-9-47.
Promulgation of regulations relating to surface effects of underground coal mining; permit requirements; suspension of mining; applicability of chapter.

The commission may promulgate regulations regarding the surface effects of underground coal mining operations establishing the following requirements. In promulgating any regulations, the commission shall consider the distinct difference between surface coal mining and underground coal mining. The regulations shall not conflict with the Federal Coal Mine Health and Safety Act of 1969, as amended or any regulation issued under that law.

Each permit issued under this chapter and relating to underground coal mining shall require the operator to:

Adopt measures consistent with known technology to prevent subsidence causing material damage to the extent technologically and economically feasible to maximize mine stability, and maintain the value and reasonably foreseeable use of any surface lands, except in instances where the mining technology used requires planned subsidence in a predictable and controlled manner. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the standard method of room and pillar mining;

Seal all portals, entryways, drifts, shafts or other openings between the surface and underground mine working when no longer needed for the conduct of the mining operations;

Fill or seal exploratory holes no longer necessary for mining, maximizing to the extent technologically and economically feasible the return of mine and processing waste, tailings, and any other waste incident to the mining operation, to the mine workings or excavations;

Stabilize all waste piles containing mine wastes, tailings, coal processing wastes and other wastes in areas other than the mine workings or excavations created by the permittee from current operations through construction in compacted layers, including the use of incombustible and impervious materials, if necessary;

Assure that the leachate will not degrade surface or ground waters below water quality standards established under applicable federal and state law;

Assure that the final contour of the waste accumulation will be compatible with natural surroundings;

Assure that the site is stabilized and revegetated according to this chapter;

Design, locate, construct, operate, maintain, enlarge, modify, and remove, or abandon, in accordance with the standards and criteria developed by the commission, all existing and new coal mine waste piles consisting of mine wastes, tailings, coal processing wastes, or other liquid and solid wastes, and used either temporarily or permanently as dams or embankments;

Establish on regraded areas, and all other lands affected, a diverse and permanent vegetative cover capable of self-regeneration and plant succession and at least equal in extent of cover to the natural vegetation of the area;

Protect offsite areas from damages which may result from the mining operations;

Eliminate fire hazards and otherwise eliminate conditions which constitute a hazard to health and safety of the public;

Minimize the disturbances of the prevailing hydrologic balance at the mine site and in associated offsite areas and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems both during and after coal mining operations and during reclamation by:

Taking measures to avoid acid or other toxic mine drainage including, but not limited to:

Preventing or removing water from contact with toxic producing deposits;

Treating drainage to reduce toxic content which adversely affects downstream water upon being released to water courses;

Casing, sealing or otherwise managing boreholes, shafts and wells to keep acid or other toxic drainage from entering ground and surface waters; and

Conducting surface coal mining operations to prevent, to the extent possible using the best technology currently available, additional levels of suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area, but in no event shall those levels be in excess of requirements set by applicable state or federal law or regulations, and avoiding channel deepening or enlargement in operations requiring the discharge of water from mines;

Operate in accordance with the general environmental protection standards promulgated under Section 53-9-45 for any effects which result from surface coal mining operations including surface impacts from the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of the activities and for haulage, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incident to the activities. The commission shall make necessary modifications in the requirements imposed by this paragraph to accommodate the distinct difference between surface and underground coal mining;

Minimize disturbances and adverse impacts of the operation to the extent possible, using the best technology currently available, on fish, wildlife and related environmental values, and achieve enhancement of those resources where practicable; and

Locate openings for all new drift mines working acid-producing or iron-producing coal seams to prevent a gravity discharge of water from the mine.

To protect the stability of the land, the permit board shall suspend underground coal mining under urbanized areas, cities, towns and communities, and under areas adjacent to industrial or commercial buildings, major impoundments or permanent streams if the permit board finds imminent danger to inhabitants of the urbanized areas, cities, towns and communities.

The provisions of this chapter relating to permits, bonds, inspections and enforcement, public notice and hearing and administrative and judicial review shall be applicable to surface operations and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine with any modifications to the permit application requirements, permit issuance or denial procedures and bond requirements as are necessary to accommodate the distinct difference between surface and underground coal mining.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 21; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-49.
Authorized departures from performance standards; experimental practices.

To encourage advances in mining and reclamation practices or to allow postmining land use for industrial, commercial, residential or public use, including recreational facilities, the commission, with the approval of the United States Secretary of the Interior or the secretary’s designee, may authorize departures in individual cases on an experimental basis from the environmental protection performance standards promulgated under Sections 53-9-45 and 53-9-47. Those departures may be authorized if:

The experimental practices are at least as environmentally protective during and after mining operations as those required by promulgated standards;

The mining operations approved for particular land-use or other purposes are not larger or more numerous than necessary to determine the effectiveness and economic feasibility of the experimental practices; and

The experimental practices do not reduce the protection afforded public health and safety below that provided by promulgated standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 37; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-51.
Records, reports and equipment to be maintained by permittees; evaluation of results; specification of monitoring sites; entry and inspection by department; release of materials to public.

For purposes of administering and enforcing any permit under this chapter, adequately developing a regulatory program, or determining whether any person is in violation of this chapter:

The commission shall require any permittee to:

Establish and maintain appropriate records;

Make monthly reports to the department;

Install, use and maintain any necessary monitoring equipment or methods;

Evaluate results in accordance with the methods, at locations and intervals and in any manner as the commission shall prescribe; and

Provide any other information relative to surface coal mining and reclamation operations as the commission deems reasonable and necessary.

For those surface coal mining and reclamation operations which remove or disturb strata that serve as aquifers which significantly insure the hydrologic balance of water use either on or off the mining site, the permit board shall specify those (i) monitoring sites to record the quantity and quality of surface drainage above and below the mine site as well as in the potential zone of influence; (ii) monitoring sites to record level, amount and samples of groundwater and aquifers potentially affected by the mining and also directly below the lowermost (deepest) coal seam to be mined; (iii) records of well logs and borehole data to be maintained; and (iv) monitoring sites to record precipitation.

The monitoring, data collection and analysis required by this section shall be conducted according to standards and procedures set forth by the commission in order to assure their reliability and validity; and

Any authorized representative of the department without advance notice and upon presentation of appropriate credentials (i) shall have the right of entry to, upon or through any surface coal mining and reclamation operations or any premises in which any records required to be maintained under paragraph (a) of this subsection are located, and (ii) may at reasonable times, and without delay, have access to and copy any records, inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operations required under this chapter.

The inspections by the authorized representative of the department shall:

Occur on an irregular basis averaging not less than one (1) partial inspection per month and one (1) complete inspection per calendar quarter for the surface coal mining and reclamation operation covered by each permit;

Occur without prior notice to the permittee or the permittee’s agents or employees except for necessary on-site meetings with the permittee; and

Include the filing of inspection reports adequate to enforce the requirements of this chapter.

Each inspector, upon detection of each violation of any requirement of this chapter, shall immediately inform the operator in writing and shall report in writing that violation to the department.

Copies of any records, reports, inspection materials or information obtained under this section by the department shall be made available as soon as possible to the public at central and sufficient locations in the county of the area of mining so that they are conveniently available to residents in the areas of mining and shall be considered public records.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, §§ 22(1)-22(2), 22(4)-22(5); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-53.
Sign at entrance of surface coal mining and reclamation operation.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrance to the surface coal mining and reclamation operation a clearly visible sign which sets forth the name, business address and phone number of the permittee and the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations. The sign shall also state that questions and complaints regarding the surface coal mining and reclamation operations may be directed to the department and shall provide the department’s telephone number.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 22(3); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).